Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
ARTICLE 31.5
FIRE AND POLICE PENSION ASSOCIATION OF COLORADO STATEWIDE RETIREMENT PLAN

Section

PART 1 ESTABLISHMENT AND ADMINISTRATION

PART 2 MEMBER PARTICIPATION

PART 3 CONTRIBUTIONS AND SERVICE CREDIT

PART 4 BENEFITS IN THE LIFETIME BENEFIT COMPONENTS

PART 5 MONEY PURCHASE COMPONENT

PART 6 AMENDMENT OF THE PLAN